Illinois, session 104th, SB2833.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 21-150 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/21-150)7    Sec. 21-150. Time of applying for judgment. Except as 8otherwise provided in this Section or by ordinance or 9resolution enacted under subsection (c) of Section 21-40, in 10any county with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, all 11applications for judgment and order of sale for taxes and 12special assessments on delinquent properties shall be made 13within 90 days after the second installment due date. In Cook 14County, all applications for judgment and order of sale for 15taxes and special assessments on delinquent properties shall 16be made (i) by July 1, 2011 for tax year 2009, (ii) by July 1, 172012 for tax year 2010, (iii) by July 1, 2013 for tax year 182011, (iv) by July 1, 2014 for tax year 2012, (v) by July 1, 192015 for tax year 2013, (vi) by May 1, 2016 for tax year 2014, 20(vii) by March 1, 2017 for tax year 2015, (viii) by April 1 of 21the next calendar year after the second installment due date 22for tax year 2016 and 2017, and (ix) within 365 days of the 23second installment due date for each tax year thereafter.   SB2833- 2 -LRB104 16977 HLH 30391 b1Notwithstanding these dates, if bills for the second 2installment of taxes in any taxable year are not mailed by the 3deadlines set forth in this Code, then the deadlines set forth 4in this Section for the application for judgment and order of 5sale shall be extended by an additional 90 days. 6    Notwithstanding these dates, in Cook County, the 7application for judgment and order of sale for the 2018 annual 8tax sale that would normally be held in calendar year 2020 9shall not be filed earlier than the first day of the first 10month during which there is no longer a statewide COVID-19 11public health emergency, as evidenced by an effective disaster 12declaration of the Governor covering all counties in the 13State, except that in no event may this application for 14judgment and order of sale be filed later than October 1, 2021. 15When a tax sale is delayed because of a statewide COVID-19 16public health emergency, no subsequent annual tax sale may 17begin earlier than 180 days after the last day of the prior 18delayed tax sale, and no scavenger tax sale may begin earlier 19than 90 days after the last day of the prior delayed tax sale. 20In those counties which have adopted an ordinance under 21Section 21-40, the application for judgment and order of sale 22for delinquent taxes shall be made in December. 23    Notwithstanding these dates, in Cook County, the 24application for judgment and order of sale for the 2023 annual 25tax sale that would normally be held in calendar year 2025 26shall be filed on or before March 10, 2026. Notwithstanding   SB2833- 3 -LRB104 16977 HLH 30391 b1Sections 9-260, 18-250, 20-100, 21-15, 21-25, and 21-45, in 2Cook County, interest shall not accrue between September 2, 32025 and April 1, 2026 on delinquent warrant year 2023 tax 4balances. 5    In the 10 years next following the completion of a general 6reassessment of property in any county with 3,000,000 or more 7inhabitants, made under an order of the Department, 8applications for judgment and order of sale shall be made as 9soon as may be and on the day specified in the advertisement 10required by Section 21-110 and 21-115. If for any cause the 11court is not held on the day specified, the cause shall stand 12continued, and it shall be unnecessary to re-advertise the 13list or notice.14    Within 30 days after the day specified for the application 15for judgment the court shall hear and determine the matter. If 16judgment is rendered, the sale shall begin on the date within 5 17business days specified in the notice as provided in Section 1821-115. If the collector is prevented from advertising and 19obtaining judgment within the time periods specified by this 20Section, the collector may obtain judgment at any time 21thereafter; but if the failure arises by the county 22collector's not complying with any of the requirements of this 23Code, he or she shall be held on his or her official bond for 24the full amount of all taxes and special assessments charged 25against him or her. Any failure on the part of the county 26collector shall not be allowed as a valid objection to the   SB2833- 4 -LRB104 16977 HLH 30391 b1collection of any tax or assessment, or to entry of a judgment 2against any delinquent properties included in the application 3of the county collector.4    As used in this Section, "warrant year" means the year 5preceding the calendar year in which the taxes first became 6due and payable. 7(Source: P.A. 104-6, eff. 6-16-25.)